Utah statutes.
11-36-501.   Private entity assessment of impact fees -- Notice and hearing -- Audit.

(1)  A private entity may only impose a charge for public facilities as a condition of development approval by imposing an impact fee.  A private entity shall comply with the requirements of this chapter before imposing an impact fee.

(2)  Except as otherwise specified in this chapter, a private entity is subject to the same requirements of this chapter as a local political subdivision.

(3)  Where notice and hearing requirements are specified, a private entity shall comply with the notice and hearing requirements for local districts.

(4)  A private entity that assesses an impact fee under this chapter is subject to the audit requirements of Title 51, Chapter 2a, Accounting Reports from Political Subdivisions, Interlocal Organizations, and Other Local Entities Act.

